Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2513
Employee; no discrimination against because of political, racial, or religious opinions or affiliations; exceptions.

No employee or person desiring to be an employee in an office governed by sections 23-2501 to 23-2516 shall be appointed, demoted or discharged, or in any way favored or discriminated against because of political, racial, or religious opinions or affiliations, but advocating, or being a member of a political party or organization that advocates the overthrow of the government of the United States or of this state by force or violence shall be sufficient reason to discharge an employee.

Laws 1971, LB 921, § 13.